Utah statutes.
59-10-1404.5.   Resident pass-through entity taxpayer's share of an
addition, subtraction, or adjustment that relates to an item of income, gain,
loss, deduction, or credit of a pass-through entity.
(1)  In determining the taxable income of a resident pass-through entity
taxpayer, an addition, subtraction, or adjustment that relates to an item of
income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit of a pass-through entity shall be
made in accordance with this section.
(2)  For a resident pass-through entity taxpayer of a pass-through entity
except for a pass-through entity that is an S corporation, the resident pass-
through entity taxpayer's share of an addition, subtraction, or adjustment
that relates to an item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit is:
(a)  if the item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit is required to be
taken into account separately for federal income tax purposes, the resident
pass-through entity taxpayer's distributive share of the item of income, gain,
loss, deduction, or credit:
(i)  for federal income tax purposes; and
(ii)  determined under Section 704 et seq., Internal Revenue Code; or
(b)  if the item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit is not required
to be taken into account separately for federal income tax purposes,
determined in accordance with the resident pass-through entity taxpayer's
distributive share of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit:
(i)  relating to the pass-through entity generally;
(ii)  for federal income tax purposes; and
(iii)  under Section 704 et seq., Internal Revenue Code.
(3)  For a resident pass-through entity taxpayer of a pass-through entity that
is an S corporation, the resident pass-through entity taxpayer's share of an
addition, subtraction, or adjustment that relates to an item of income, gain,
loss, deduction, or credit is:
(a)  if the item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit is required to be
taken into account separately for federal income tax purposes, the resident
pass-through entity taxpayer's pro rata share of the item of income, gain,
loss, deduction, or credit:
(i)  for federal income tax purposes; and
(ii)  determined under Section 1366 et seq., Internal Revenue Code; or
(b)  if the item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit is not required
to be taken into account separately for federal income tax purposes,
determined in accordance with the resident pass-through entity taxpayer's pro
rata share of the item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit:
(i)  relating to the pass-through entity generally;
(ii)  for federal income tax purposes; and
(iii)  under Section 1366 et seq., Internal Revenue Code.
